Tennessee, session 114, HB1460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, the Department of Transportation
shall replace or modify the sign located near mile marker 405.4 on Interstate 40 eastbound to
replace references to a stadium formerly located off Exit 407 with the language "The Island in
Pigeon Forge".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1460
010147
- 1 -